apertium-tg-fa.fa.metadix
    <pardef n="آنانی__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>آنانی</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="آنجایی__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>آنجایی</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ﺩﺭ__pr">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="pr"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="برا/ی__pr">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ی</l>
          <r>ی<s n="pr"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ی</l>
          <r>ی<s n="pr"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__poss"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="ﺩرباره__pr">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="pr"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="هنوز__adv">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="adv"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="و__cnjcoo">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="cnjcoo"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="که__rel">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="rel"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ﺍیﻥ__prn">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>هﺍ</l>
          <r><s n="prn"/><s n="dem"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="هیچ__prn">
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="prn"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="هر__det">
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="det"/><s n="ind"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ﺍیﻥ__det">
      <e>       <p><l/><r><s n="det"/><s n="dem"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="دوم__det">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="ord"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <!-- Find out what ~in means -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ین</l>
          <r><s n="det"/><s n="ord"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="یک__num">
      <e>
        <p> 
          <l/>
          <r><s n="num"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__ی"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="ﺩﻭ__num">
      <e>
        <p> 
          <l/>
          <r><s n="num"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__ی"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>


    <pardef n="تاجیکستان__np">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="top"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__را"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="فروغ__np">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="ant"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__را"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="الجبهة_الشعبية_لتحرير_فلسطين__np">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="np"/><s n="al"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__را"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>



<!-- possessive pronouns -->
    <pardef n="S__pos__cons">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>م</l>
          <r><j/>enc<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ت</l>
          <r><j/>enc<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ش</l>
          <r><j/>enc<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>مان</l>
          <r><j/>enc<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>تان</l>
          <r><j/>enc<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>شان</l>
          <r><j/>enc<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
	</pardef>
      <!-- Passthrough -->
<!-- possessive pronouns: only when the last letter is ه and sounds `e` -->
    <pardef n="S__pos__vowel">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ام</l>
          <r><j/>enc<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ات</l>
          <r><j/>enc<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>اش</l>
          <r><j/>enc<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>مان</l>
          <r><j/>enc<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>تان</l>
          <r><j/>enc<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>شان</l>
          <r><j/>enc<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>
<!-- possessive pronouns: only when the last letter is (ه) and sounds (e) -other used form -->
    <pardef n="S__pos__vowels">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ام</l>
          <r><j/>enc<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ات</l>
          <r><j/>enc<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>اش</l>
          <r><j/>enc<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>یمان</l>
          <r><j/>enc<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>یتان</l>
          <r><j/>enc<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>یشان</l>
          <r><j/>enc<s n="prn"/><s n="pos"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      </pardef>
<!-- possessive pronouns: end -->

    <!--  -->
    <pardef n="دشمن__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__ی"/>
        <par n="S__ه"/>
        <par n="S__را"/>
      </e>
      <!-- plural with (ها), entry with ZWNJ -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>‌ها</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__یی"/>
        <par n="S__را"/>
      </e>
      <!-- plural with (ها), entry without ZWNJ -->
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ها</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__یی"/>
        <par n="S__را"/>
      </e>
      <!-- plural with (ان) -->
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ان</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__ی"/>
        <par n="S__را"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>
    <!--  -->
    <pardef n="آزادی__n">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l/>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__poss"/>
        <par n="S__ی"/>
        <par n="S__ه"/>
        <par n="S__را"/>
      </e>
      <!-- plural with (ها), entry with ZWNJ -->
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>‌ها</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__یی"/>
        <par n="S__ه"/>
        <par n="S__را"/>
      </e>
      <!-- plural with (ها), entry without ZWNJ -->
      <e r="LR">
        <p>
          <l>ها</l>
          <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
        <par n="S__یی"/>
        <par n="S__را"/>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="و"><i>و</i><par n="و__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="ای"><i>ای</i><par n="و__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="یا"><i>یا</i><par n="و__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="ویا"><i>ویا</i><par n="و__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="لیکن"><i>لیکن</i><par n="و__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="اما"><i>اما</i><par n="و__cnjcoo"/></e>
    <e lm="که"><i>که</i><par n="که__rel"/></e>
    <e lm="ﺍیﻥ"><i>ﺍیﻥ</i><par n="ﺍیﻥ__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="هیچ"><i>هیچ</i><par n="هیچ__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="هیچکس"><i>هیچکس</i><par n="هیچ__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="هیچیک"><i>هیچیک</i><par n="هیچ__prn"/></e>
    <e lm="ﺍیﻥ"><i>ﺍیﻥ</i><par n="ﺍیﻥ__det"/></e>
    <e lm="هر"><i>هر</i><par n="هر__det"/></e>
    <e lm="با"><i>با</i><par n="ﺩﺭ__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="به"><i>به</i><par n="ﺩﺭ__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="چون"><i>چون</i><par n="ﺩﺭ__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="مثل"><i>مثل</i><par n="ﺩﺭ__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="برای"><i>برا</i><par n="برا/ی__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="برایت"><i>برایت</i><par n="ﺩﺭ__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="برایشان"><i>برایشان</i><par n="ﺩﺭ__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="اگرهم"><i>اگرهم</i><par n="ﺩﺭ__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="زیرا"><i>زیرا</i><par n="ﺩﺭ__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="لکن"><i>لکن</i><par n="ﺩﺭ__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="وبا"><i>وبا</i><par n="ﺩﺭ__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="ولو"><i>ولو</i><par n="ﺩﺭ__pr"/></e>
    <e lm="یک"><i>یک</i><par n="یک__num"/></e>
    <e lm="سه"><i>سه</i><par n="ﺩﻭ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="پنج"><i>پنج</i><par n="ﺩﻭ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="هفت"><i>هفت</i><par n="ﺩﻭ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="نه"><i>نه</i><par n="ﺩﻭ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="یازده"><i>یازده</i><par n="ﺩﻭ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="سیزده"><i>سیزده</i><par n="ﺩﻭ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="پانزده"><i>پانزده</i><par n="ﺩﻭ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="هفده"><i>هفده</i><par n="ﺩﻭ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="سی"><i>سی</i><par n="ﺩﻭ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="هفتاد"><i>هفتاد</i><par n="ﺩﻭ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="دوصد"><i>دوصد</i><par n="ﺩﻭ__num"/></e>
    <e lm="اريتره"><i>اريتره</i><par n="تاجیکستان__np"/></e>
    <e lm="امارات متحده عربی"><i>امارات<b/>متحده<b/>عربی</i><par n="تاجیکستان__np"/></e>
    <e lm="برزیل"><i>برزیل</i><par n="تاجیکستان__np"/></e>
    <e lm="پاراگوئه"><i>پاراگوئه</i><par n="تاجیکستان__np"/></e>
    <e lm="تونگا"><i>تونگا</i><par n="تاجیکستان__np"/></e>
    <e lm="رومانی"><i>رومانی</i><par n="تاجیکستان__np"/></e>
    <e lm="فیلیپین"><i>فیلیپین</i><par n="تاجیکستان__np"/></e>
    <e lm="لتونی"><i>لتونی</i><par n="تاجیکستان__np"/></e>
    <e lm="نیجریه"><i>نیجریه</i><par n="تاجیکستان__np"/></e>
    <e lm="کارولینای جنوبی"><i>کارولینای<b/>جنوبی</i><par n="تاجیکستان__np"/></e>
    <e lm="بنگلور"><i>بنگلور</i><par n="تاجیکستان__np"/></e>
    <e lm="الجبهة الشعبية لتحرير فلسطين"><i>الجبهة<b/>الشعبية<b/>لتحرير<b/>فلسطين</i><par n="الجبهة_الشعبية_لتحرير_فلسطين__np"/></e>
    <e lm="حزب الله"><i>حزب<b/>الله</i><par n="الجبهة_الشعبية_لتحرير_فلسطين__np"/></e>
    <e lm="اماراتی"><i>اماراتی</i><par n="دشمن__n"/></e>
    <e lm="پارتی"><i>پارتی</i><par n="دشمن__n"/></e>
    <e lm="خراسانی"><i>خراسانی</i><par n="دشمن__n"/></e>
    <e lm="زرتشتی"><i>زرتشتی</i><par n="دشمن__n"/></e>
    <e lm="عالم"><i>عالم</i><par n="دشمن__n"/></e>
    <e lm="کارکن"><i>کارکن</i><par n="دشمن__n"/></e>
    <e lm="محقق"><i>محقق</i><par n="دشمن__n"/></e>
    <e lm="مقیم"><i>مقیم</i><par n="دشمن__n"/></e>
    <e lm="اکسیژن"><i>اکسیژن</i><par n="آزادی__n"/></e>
    <e lm="بستان"><i>بستان</i><par n="آزادی__n"/></e>
    <e lm="جانی"><i>جانی</i><par n="آزادی__n"/></e>
    <e lm="رکن"><i>رکن</i><par n="آزادی__n"/></e>
    <e lm="عقلانیت"><i>عقلانیت</i><par n="آزادی__n"/></e>
    <e lm="متالورژی"><i>متالورژی</i><par n="آزادی__n"/></e>
    <e lm="وب"><i>وب</i><par n="آزادی__n"/></e>
    <e lm="بیکار"><i>بیکار</i><par n="دشمن__n"/></e>
    <e lm="شهید"><i>شهید</i><par n="دشمن__n"/></e>
    <e lm="خرد"><i>خرد</i><par n="آزادی__n"/></e>
    <e lm="گوهر"><i>گوهر</i><par n="آزادی__n"/></e>
    <e lm="دوشنبه"><i>دوشنبه</i><par n="آزادی__n"/></e>
    <e lm="ازسویی دیگر"><i>ازسویی دیگر</i><par n="هنوز__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="اینجا"><i>اینجا</i><par n="هنوز__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="اینهم"><i>اینهم</i><par n="هنوز__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="بتندی"><i>بتندی</i><par n="هنوز__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="بلیط"><i>بلیط</i><par n="هنوز__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="حال"><i>حال</i><par n="هنوز__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="درصورت"><i>درصورت</i><par n="هنوز__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="صریحاً"><i>صریحاً</i><par n="هنوز__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="کلا"><i>کلا</i><par n="هنوز__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="مسلما"><i>مسلما</i><par n="هنوز__adv"/></e>
    <e lm="والنشر"><i>والنشر</i><par n="هنوز__adv"/></e>
